District of Columbia statutes.
7-1231.11

Evaluation of mental health services and supports.

Consumers shall have an opportunity to participate in periodic evaluation of mental health services and mental health supports, including evaluation of providers. The opportunity shall extend to members of the consumer’s family or personal representative.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 211, 48 DCR 7674
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 211 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).